Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.270

Authority of officer or other person under warrant.

Such warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom directed to arrest the accused at any time and any place where he or she may be found within the state and to command the aid of all peace officers or other persons in the execution of the warrant, and to deliver the accused, subject to the provisions of this chapter to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1071; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 8.]